Hawaii, session 2026, HB2369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the judiciary fulfills key components of its statutory mandate through contracts with community-based organizations that provide essential services to individuals and families involved in the justice system.  These organizations support access to justice for victims of domestic violence, court-involved youth, individuals navigating civil legal processes, and other vulnerable populations who depend on programs connected to the judiciary for safety, stability, and support. The legislature further finds that the costs incurred by community-based organizations to provide these services, including wages, utilities, and administrative expenses, have increased significantly during the past decade, while government contract rates have remained stagnant.  As a result, many organizations providing judiciary-related services are unable to cover their full cost of operations, threatening the continuity and effectiveness of critical services statewide. Accordingly, the purpose of this bill is to ensure the continued delivery of essential services supporting the judiciary's statutory mandate by: (1)  Requiring contracts for services awarded by the judiciary to community-based organizations to include protections against inflation; and (2)  Appropriating funds to the judiciary to increase the contract price in existing contracts for services provided by community-based organizations in support of fulfilling its statutory mandate to individuals, families, and communities in the State. SECTION 2. Beginning January 1, 2027, contracts awarded to community-based organizations by the judiciary for services in support of fulfilling its statutory mandate to individuals, families, and communities in the State, including supporting access to justice, shall: (1)  Be for a term of multiple years; and (2)  Include a provision that requires the contract price to be adjusted on an annual basis based on increases in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, or a successor index, as reported by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to increase the contract price under existing contracts for services provided by community-based organizations in support of fulfilling the judiciary's statutory mandate toward individuals, families, and communities. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________